Hawaii statutes.
[§676‑4] Effects of transfer of
structured settlement payment rights. Following a transfer of structured
settlement payment rights under this chapter:

(1) The structured settlement obligor and the annuity
issuer, as to all parties except the transferee, shall be discharged and
released from any and all liability for the transferred payments;

(2) The transferee shall be liable to the structured
settlement obligor and the annuity issuer:

(A) For any taxes incurred by the parties as
a consequence of the transfer, if the transfer contravenes the terms of the
structured settlement; and

(B) For any other liabilities or costs,
including reasonable costs and attorneys' fees, arising from compliance by the
parties with the order of the court or responsible administrative authority, or
arising as a consequence of the transferee's failure to comply with this
chapter;

(3) Neither the annuity issuer nor the structured
settlement obligor may be required to divide any periodic payment between the
payee and any transferee or assignee or between two or more transferees or
assignees; and

(4) Any further transfer of structured settlement
payment rights by the payee may be made only after compliance with all of the
requirements of this chapter. [L 2006, c 146, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next